Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.43
Flavored malt beverage, defined.

Flavored malt
beverage means a beer that derives not more than forty-nine percent of its
total alcohol content from flavors or flavorings containing alcohol obtained
by distillation, except that in the case of a malt beverage with an alcohol
content of more than six percent by volume, not more than one and one-half
percent of the volume of the malt beverage may consist of alcohol derived
from flavors, flavorings, or other nonbeverage ingredients containing alcohol
obtained by distillation.

Laws 2012, LB824, § 4.